Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.110

Judge must excuse unfit person.

It shall be the duty of a judge to excuse from further jury service any juror, who in the opinion of the judge, has manifested unfitness as a juror by reason of bias, prejudice, indifference, inattention or any physical or mental defect or by reason of conduct or practices incompatible with proper and efficient jury service.

[ 1988 c 188 s 11; 1925 ex.s. c 191 s 3; RRS s 97-1.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1988 c 188: See notes following RCW 2.36.010.